Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.810

Prenatal substance exposure treatment—Contracting.

(1) By January 1, 2024, the authority, on behalf of clients or potential clients of the department of children, youth, and families as described in this subsection, shall contract with a provider with expertise in comprehensive prenatal substance exposure treatment and family supports to offer services to children over the age of three and families who are or have been involved in the child welfare system or who are at risk of becoming involved in the child welfare system. This contract shall maximize the number of families that can be served through referrals by authority employees and other community partners in order to keep families together, reduce the number of placements, and prevent adverse outcomes for impacted children.

(2) By January 1, 2025, the authority, on behalf of clients or potential clients of the department of children, youth, and families as described in this subsection, shall contract with up to three providers across the state, in addition to the contracted provider in subsection (1) of this section, to offer comprehensive treatment services for prenatal substance exposure and family supports for children who were prenatally exposed to substances and who are, or have been, involved in the child welfare system.

(3) Comprehensive treatment and family supports must be trauma-informed and may include:

(a) Occupational, speech, and language therapy;

(b) Behavioral health counseling and caregiver counseling;

(c) Sensory processing support;

(d) Educational advocacy, psychoeducation, social skills support, and groups;

(e) Linkages to community resources; and

(f) Family supports and education, including the programs for parents, caregivers, and families recommended by the federal centers for disease control and prevention.

(4) The authority shall contract with the provider referenced in subsection (1) of this section to support the providers under contract in subsection (2) of this section by:

(a) Creating education and training programs for providers working with children who had prenatal substance exposure; and

(b) Offering ongoing coaching and support in creating a safe and healing environment, free from judgment, where families are supported through the challenges of care for children with prenatal substance exposure.

(5) The authority, in collaboration with the department of children, youth, and families, shall work with the contracted providers and families to collect relevant outcome data and provide a report on the expansion of services under the contracts and the outcomes experienced by persons receiving services under this section. The authority shall submit the report to the legislature with any recommendations related to improving availability of and access to services and ways to improve outcomes by June 1, 2028.

[ 2023 c 288 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 288: "The legislature finds that:

(1) Fetal alcohol spectrum disorders are lifelong physical, developmental, behavioral, and intellectual disabilities caused by prenatal alcohol exposure;

(2) According to the federal centers for disease control and prevention, fetal alcohol spectrum disorders affect as many as one in 20 people in the United States;

(3) The health care authority estimates that one percent of births, or approximately 870 children each year, are born with fetal alcohol spectrum disorders;

(4) In addition to alcohol use, other substances consumed during pregnancy may result in prenatal substance exposure affecting the physical, developmental, behavioral, and intellectual abilities of the exposed child;

(5) Washington has limited diagnostic capacity and currently lacks the capacity to diagnose and treat every child who needs support and treatment due to prenatal substance exposure;

(6) Without appropriate treatment and supports, children born with fetal alcohol spectrum disorders and other prenatal substance disorders are likely to experience adverse outcomes. According to current statistics, these children face adverse outcomes such as:

(a) 61 percent of children with fetal alcohol spectrum disorders are suspended or expelled from school by age 12;

(b) 90 percent of persons with fetal alcohol spectrum disorders develop comorbid mental health conditions; and

(c) 60 percent of youth with fetal alcohol spectrum disorders are involved in the justice system;

(7) Untreated and unsupported prenatal substance exposure results in higher costs for the state and worse outcomes for children and their families;

(8) Investing in prevention and earlier intervention, including diagnostic capacity, treatment, and services for children and supports for families and caregivers will improve school outcomes; and

(9) Effective prenatal substance exposure response requires effective and ongoing cross-agency strategic planning and coordination." [ 2023 c 288 s 1.]